Vermont, session 2025-2026, H462.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. CHARTER AMENDMENT APPROVAL
The General Assembly approves the amendment of the charter of the City
of Burlington as set forth in this act. Voters approved the proposal of
amendment on March 2, 2021.
Sec. 2. 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 3 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 3. CITY OF BURLINGTON
* * *
§ 48. ENUMERATED
VT LEG #380644 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.462
2025 Page 2 of 3
The City Council shall have power:
* * *
(67)(A) To provide by ordinance protections for residential tenants, as
defined in 9 V.S.A. chapter 137, from eviction without “just cause,” where
“just cause” shall include:
(i) a tenant’s material breach of a written rental agreement;
(ii) a tenant’s violation of State statutes regulating tenant
obligations in residential rental agreements;
(iii) nonpayment of rent; and
(iv) a tenant’s failure to accept written, reasonable, good faith
renewal terms.
(B) The ordinance shall exclude from “just cause” the expiration of a
rental agreement as the sole grounds for termination of tenancy. In addition to
the exemptions in 9 V.S.A. chapter 137, the ordinance shall exempt from this
provision, subject to mitigation provisions, sublets and in-unit rentals as well
as the following properties, but not limited to:
(i) owner-occupied duplexes and triplexes;
(ii) those being withdrawn from the rental market, including
properties to be occupied by the owner or an immediate family member as a
primary residence; and
VT LEG #380644 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.462
2025 Page 3 of 3
(iii) those in need of substantial renovations that preclude
occupancy.
(C) The ordinance shall include provisions that:
(i) mitigate potential negative impacts on tenants and property
owners, including requirements of adequate notice and reasonable relocation
expenses;
(ii) provide for a reasonable probationary period after initial
occupancy; and
(iii) limit unreasonable rent increases to prevent de facto evictions
or nonrenewals, although this shall not be construed to limit rents beyond the
purpose of preventing individual evictions.
(D) The ordinance shall define what is “reasonable” and “adequate
notice” in defining “just cause” and shall require that landlords provide notice
of just cause and other legal requirements as part of the rental agreement.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380644 v.1